Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1408
County or township roads; emergencies; authority of county or township boards.

When an emergency or unusual condition exists requiring immediate action in order to preserve a county or township road or provide for safe conditions, the county board as to county roads within the county and the township board as to township roads within the township, or some person to whom such board has delegated such authority, may cause necessary repairs to be made, necessary services to be provided, or may contract for such repairs, or services without calling for competitive bids.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. I, § 8, p. 510.